Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.095

Supervised experience hours—Reductions for certified chemical dependency professionals.

The department shall reduce the total number of supervised experience hours required under RCW 18.225.090 by ten percent for any applicant for a license under this chapter who has practiced as a certified chemical dependency professional for three years in the previous ten years.

[ 2019 c 444 s 28.]